Washington statutes.
RCW 11.118.100

Trustee powers.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument or in this chapter, all powers and duties conferred on a trustee under Washington law also apply to the trustee of a trust for animals.

[ 2001 c 327 s 12.]